Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201845-918.04
Licensee; payment options; electronic payment with authorization.

(1) A licensee may pay the proceeds from a delayed deposit transaction or rebate to the maker in the form of check, money order, cash, stored value card, Internet transfer, or authorized automated clearinghouse transaction. Neither the licensee nor any affiliate of the licensee shall charge the maker an additional finance charge or fee for cashing the licensee's check or for negotiating forms of transaction proceeds or rebates other than cash.

(2) A licensee may utilize electronic payment through transfer or withdrawal of funds from the maker’s account only, but only with the written authorization of the maker.

Laws 2018, LB194, § 13.
January 1, 2019